Virginia statutes. Title 17.1. Courts of Record.
Article 1. Clerk of Supreme Court.

§ 17.1-200.
Clerk of Supreme Court; appointment; removal.

There shall be a clerk of the Supreme Court, who shall be appointed by and shall hold office at the pleasure of the Court. In addition to his regular duties as clerk, he shall perform such other duties and services as the Court may require, without additional compensation.

History.

Code 1919, § 3378, § 17-33; 1934, p. 427; 1938, p. 131; 1998, c. 872.

Research References.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 1. Courts. § 1.02 Supreme Court of Virginia. Friend.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Circuit court clerk’s statutory duties do not extend to the preparation of sketch orders in criminal cases.

See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Judy L. Worthington, Clerk of Circuit Court of Chesterfield County, 05-054, 2005 Va. AG LEXIS 37 (9/19/05).

Statutory duties of a circuit court clerk

do not require the preparation of sketch orders in civil cases. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Judy L. Worthington, Chesterfield County Circuit Court Clerk, 09-007, 2009 Va. AG LEXIS 19 (2/27/09).

A locality or a circuit court judge does not have the statutory authority to direct how a circuit court clerk uses the Technology Trust Fund monies allocated to such clerk’s office pursuant to §

17.1-279

. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable John T. Frey, Fairfax County Circuit Court Clerk, 09-055, 2009 Va. AG LEXIS 40 (10/8/09).

§ 17.1-201.
Appointment of deputies; their duties; how removed, etc.

The Supreme Court, or any four of the justices thereof in vacation concurring in the appointment, may appoint one or more deputy clerks, who may discharge any of the official duties of the clerk during their continuance in office. Any deputy clerk may be removed from office by the Court or by any four of the justices thereof in vacation. Any such appointment or removal in vacation shall be in writing and shall be maintained with the records of the Court.

History.

Code 1919, § 3379, § 17-34; 1934, p. 427; 1938, p. 131; 1998, c. 872.

Cross references.

As to appointment of deputies by clerks of any circuit court, see §

15.2-1603

.

§ 17.1-202.
Clerk, etc., of Supreme Court not to act as counsel.

No clerk, deputy clerk or employee of the Supreme Court shall act as counsel in any case pending in the Court or which may be taken to the Court by appeal or otherwise. Any clerk, deputy clerk or employee violating this section shall be removed from office or employment, as the case may be, in the manner provided in §

17.1-201

.

History.

Code 1919, § 3380, § 17-35; 1938, p. 131; 1998, c. 872.

§ 17.1-203.
Where clerk’s offices to be kept.

The clerk of the Supreme Court shall maintain a clerk’s office at Richmond, at such place as the Court shall direct.

History.

Code 1919, § 3385, § 17-37; 1938, p. 132; 1998, c. 872.

§ 17.1-204.
Examination of office and accounts of clerk.

The books and accounts of the clerk of the Supreme Court shall be audited as determined necessary by the Auditor of Public Accounts, who shall make reports of his findings to the Governor and file a copy of such report with the Court within 30 days after the completion of any such audit.

History.

Code 1919, § 3383, § 17-39; 1934, p. 427; 1938, p. 132; 1998, c. 872; 2018, cc. 57, 307.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 57 and 307 are identical, and substituted “as determined necessary” for “annually and at such other times as the Court may deem proper” and substituted “30 days” for “thirty days.”

§ 17.1-205.
Pro Hac Vice Fund.

There is hereby established the Pro Hac Vice Fund, a special, nonreverting fund comprised of moneys collected pursuant to Rule 1A:4 of the Rules of the Supreme Court and subsection B of §

17.1-328

. The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All moneys received by the Clerk of the Supreme Court for this Fund shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used solely for the purpose of improving the administration of justice. Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written authorization of the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court.

History.

2007, cc. 113, 372.

§ 17.1-205.1.
Sealing Fee Fund.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Sealing Fee Fund, referred to in this section as “the Fund.” The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All funds accruing to the Fund pursuant to §§

19.2-392.12

and

19.2-392.16

and all funds appropriated for such purpose and any gifts, donations, grants, bequests, and other funds received on its behalf shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. The Fund shall be administered by the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court, who shall use such funds solely to fund the costs for the compensation of court-appointed counsel under the provisions of subsection L of §

19.2-392.12

. Expenditures from the Fund shall be limited by an appropriation in the general appropriation act. Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon request of the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 524, 542.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 524 and 542, cl. 17 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 1289 of the Acts of Assembly of 2020 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2021.